Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.230

Payment to accused if charges dismissed, acquitted.

Upon dismissal of charges or acquittal of any accused person the department shall immediately pay over to such accused person the moneys in the escrow account established on behalf of such accused person.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.